Missouri, session 2026, HB2703.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 640.144, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 640.144, to read as follows:
640.144. 1. All community water systems shall be required to create a valve
inspection program that includes:
(1) Inspection of all valves every ten years;
(2) Scheduled repair or replacement of broken valves; and
(3) Within five years of August 28, 2020, identification of each shut-off valve
location using a geographic information system or an alternative physical mapping system
that accurately identifies the location of each valve.
2. All community water systems shall be required to create a hydrant inspection
program that includes:
(1) Scheduled testing of every hydrant in the community water system;
(2) Scheduled repair or replacement of broken hydrants;
(3) A plan to flush every hydrant and dead-end main;
(4) Maintenance of records of inspections, tests, and flushings for six years; and
(5) Within five years of August 28, 2020, identification of each hydrant location
using a geographic information system or an alternative physical mapping system that
accurately identifies the location of each hydrant.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2703 2
3. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any state parks, cities with a
population of more than thirty thousand inhabitants, [a] any county with a charter form of
government and with more than six hundred thousand but fewer than seven hundred thousand
inhabitants, [a] any county with a charter form of government and with more than nine
hundred fifty thousand inhabitants, or [a] any public service commission regulated utility
with more than thirty thousand customers.
✔